Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF614.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 7 TLSB 1390SV (2) 91 jm/jh S.F. 614 DIVISION I 1 DISCLOSURE OF TAX INFORMATION 2 Section 1. Section 421.19, subsection 2, Code 2025, is 3 amended by striking the subsection and inserting in lieu 4 thereof the following: 5 2. The department may notify federal, state, or local 6 law enforcement agencies, and may disclose state returns, 7 state return information, state investigative information or 8 audit information, or any other state information, to such law 9 enforcement agencies, if the department has information that 10 indicates any of the following: 11 a. A person intentionally filed a false claim, affidavit, 12 return, or other information with intent to evade tax or obtain 13 a refund, credit, or other benefit from the department. 14 b. A person failed to file a return with intent to evade a 15 tax or filing requirement. 16 c. A person failed to pay with the intent to evade tax. 17 d. A person committed any act or omission that is a criminal 18 offense under a provision of this title administered by the 19 department. 20 Sec. 2. Section 421.19, subsection 3, Code 2025, is amended 21 to read as follows: 22 3. Notwithstanding sections 422.20 and 422.72 , the 23 department may disclose state returns, state return 24 information, state investigative or audit information, or any 25 other state information as provided under this section . 26 Sec. 3. Section 422.20, subsection 3, paragraph a, Code 27 2025, is amended to read as follows: 28 a. Unless otherwise expressly permitted by section 8G.4 , 29 section 11.41 , section 96.11, subsection 6 , section 421.17, 30 subsections 22, 23, and 26 , section 421.17, subsection 27 , 31 paragraph âkâ , section 421.17, subsection 31 , section 252B.9 , 32 section 321.40, subsection 6 , sections 321.120 , 421.19 , 421.28 , 33 421.59 , 421.65 , 422.72 , and 452A.63 , and 556.19, subsection 2, 34 this section , or another provision of law, a tax return, return 35 -1- LSB 1390SV (2) 91 jm/jh 1/ 42 S.F. 614 information, or investigative or audit information shall not 1 be divulged to any person or entity, other than the taxpayer, 2 the department, or internal revenue service for use in a matter 3 unrelated to tax administration. 4 Sec. 4. Section 422.72, subsection 3, paragraph a, Code 5 2025, is amended to read as follows: 6 a. Unless otherwise expressly permitted by section 8G.4 , 7 section 11.41 , section 96.11, subsection 6 , section 421.17, 8 subsections 22, 23, and 26 , section 421.17, subsection 27 , 9 paragraph âkâ , section 421.17, subsection 31 , section 252B.9 , 10 section 321.40, subsection 6 , sections 321.120 , 421.19 , 421.28 , 11 421.65 , 422.20 , and 452A.63 , and section 556.19, subsection 2, 12 this section , or another provision of law, a tax return, return 13 information, or investigative or audit information shall not 14 be divulged to any person or entity, other than the taxpayer, 15 the department, or internal revenue service for use in a matter 16 unrelated to tax administration. 17 Sec. 5. EFFECTIVE DATE. This division of this Act, being 18 deemed of immediate importance, takes effect upon enactment. 19 DIVISION II 20 ANNUAL REPORTING 21 Sec. 6. Section 421.60, subsection 2, paragraph k, Code 22 2025, is amended by striking the paragraph. 23 Sec. 7. Section 422.75, Code 2025, is amended to read as 24 follows: 25 422.75 Statistics ââ publication. 26 The department shall prepare and publish an annual report 27 which shall include statistics reasonably available, with 28 respect to the operation of this chapter , including amounts 29 collected, classification of taxpayers, and such other facts 30 as are deemed pertinent and valuable. The annual report shall 31 also include the reports and information required pursuant to 32 section 421.60, subsection 2 , paragraph âkâ . 33 DIVISION III 34 PROPERTY TAX ââ CHANGES 35 -2- LSB 1390SV (2) 91 jm/jh 2/ 42 S.F. 614 Sec. 8. Section 425.20, subsection 3, Code 2025, is amended 1 to read as follows: 2 3. In case of sickness, absence, or other disability of 3 the claimant or if, in the judgment of the director of revenue 4 or the director of health and human services , as applicable, 5 good cause exists and the claimant requests an extension, the 6 director of health and human services may extend the time for 7 filing a claim for reimbursement and the director of revenue 8 may extend the time for filing a claim for credit . However, 9 any further time granted shall not extend beyond December 31 10 of the year following the year in which the claim was required 11 to be filed. Claims filed as a result of this subsection shall 12 be filed with the director of health and human services or the 13 director of revenue, as applicable, who shall provide for the 14 reimbursement of the claim to the claimant. 15 Sec. 9. Section 445.60, Code 2025, is amended to read as 16 follows: 17 445.60 Refunding erroneous tax. 18 The board of supervisors shall direct the county treasurer 19 to refund to the taxpayer any tax or portion of a tax found to 20 have been erroneously or illegally paid, with all interest, 21 fees, and costs actually paid. A refund shall not be ordered 22 or made unless a claim for refund is presented to the board 23 within two years of the date the tax was due, or if appealed 24 to the board of review, the property assessment appeal board, 25 director of revenue, or district court, within two years of the 26 final decision. 27 Sec. 10. EFFECTIVE DATE. The following, being deemed of 28 immediate importance, takes effect upon enactment: 29 The section of this division of this Act amending section 30 445.60. 31 DIVISION IV 32 FARM TENANCY INCOME TAX EXCLUSION 33 Sec. 11. Section 422.7, subsection 14, paragraph a, Code 34 2025, is amended to read as follows: 35 -3- LSB 1390SV (2) 91 jm/jh 3/ 42 S.F. 614 a. Subtract, to the extent included, net income received 1 by an eligible individual pursuant to a farm tenancy agreement 2 covering real property held by the eligible individual for 3 ten or more years, if the eligible individual materially 4 participated in a farming business for ten or more years in the 5 aggregate . 6 Sec. 12. Section 422.7, subsection 14, paragraph f, Code 7 2025, is amended by adding the following new subparagraph: 8 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (04) âHeldâ shall be determined with 9 reference to the holding period provisions of section 1223 of 10 the Internal Revenue Code and the federal regulations pursuant 11 thereto. 12 DIVISION V 13 PASS-THROUGH ENTITIES 14 Sec. 13. Section 422.25C, subsection 2, Code 2025, is 15 amended to read as follows: 16 2. For tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2020, any 17 adjustments to a partnershipâs or pass-through entityâs items 18 of income, gain, loss, expense, or credit, or an adjustment to 19 such items allocated to a partner that holds an interest in a 20 partnership or pass-through entity for the reviewed year by 21 the department as a result of a state partnership audit, shall 22 be determined at the partnership level or pass-through entity 23 level in the same manner as provided by section 6221(a) of the 24 Internal Revenue Code and the regulations thereunder unless a 25 different treatment is specifically provided in this title . 26 The provisions of sections 6222, 6223, and 6227 of the Internal 27 Revenue Code and the regulations thereunder shall also apply to 28 a partnership or pass-through entity and its direct or indirect 29 partners in the same manner as provided in such sections unless 30 a different treatment is specifically provided in this title . 31 For purposes of applying such sections, due account shall be 32 made for differences in federal and Iowa terminology. The 33 adjustment provided by section 6221(a) of the Internal Revenue 34 Code shall be determined as provided in such section but shall 35 -4- LSB 1390SV (2) 91 jm/jh 4/ 42 S.F. 614 be based on Iowa taxable income or other tax attributes of 1 the partnership or pass-through entity as determined pursuant 2 to this chapter for the reviewed year. The department shall 3 issue a notice of adjustment to the partnership or pass-through 4 entity. Such notice shall be treated as an assessment for the 5 purposes of section 422.25 , and the notice shall be appealable , 6 except as provided in section 422.25, by the partnership or 7 pass-through entity pursuant to sections 422.28 and 422.29 and 8 shall be issued within the time period provided by section 9 422.25 . Once the adjustments to partnership-related or 10 pass-through entity-related items or reallocations of income, 11 gains, losses, expenses, credits, and other attributes among 12 such partners for the reviewed year are finally determined, 13 the partnership or pass-through entity and any direct partners 14 or indirect partners shall then be subject to the provisions 15 of section 422.25, subsection 1 , paragraph âeâ , and section 16 422.25A in the same manner as if the state partnership audit 17 were a federal partnership level audit, and as if the final 18 state partnership audit adjustment were a final federal 19 partnership adjustment. The penalty exceptions in section 20 421.27, subsection 2 , paragraphs âbâ and âcâ , shall not apply 21 to a state partnership audit. 22 Sec. 14. EFFECTIVE DATE. This division of this Act, being 23 deemed of immediate importance, takes effect upon enactment. 24 Sec. 15. RETROACTIVE APPLICABILITY. This division of this 25 Act applies retroactively to January 1, 2024. 26 DIVISION VI 27 SALES TAX CHANGES 28 Sec. 16. Section 423.2, subsection 1, paragraph b, Code 29 2025, is amended to read as follows: 30 b. (1) Sales of building materials, supplies, and equipment 31 to owners , contractors, subcontractors, or builders for the 32 erection of buildings or the alteration, repair, or improvement 33 of real property are retail sales of tangible personal property 34 in whatever quantity sold . Where the owner, contractor, 35 -5- LSB 1390SV (2) 91 jm/jh 5/ 42 S.F. 614 subcontractor, or builder is also a retailer holding a sales 1 or use tax permit and transacting retail sales of building 2 materials, supplies, and equipment, the person shall purchase 3 such items of tangible personal property without liability for 4 the tax if such property will be subject to the tax at the 5 time of resale or at the time it is withdrawn from inventory 6 for construction purposes. The sales tax shall be due in the 7 reporting period when the materials, supplies, and equipment 8 are withdrawn from inventory for construction purposes or 9 when sold at retail. The tax shall not be due when materials 10 are withdrawn from inventory for use in construction outside 11 of Iowa and the tax shall not apply to tangible personal 12 property purchased and consumed by the manufacturer as building 13 materials in the performance by the manufacturer or its 14 subcontractor of construction outside of Iowa. The sale of 15 carpeting is not a sale of building materials. The sale of 16 carpeting to owners, contractors, subcontractors, or builders 17 shall be treated as the sale of ordinary tangible personal 18 property and subject to the tax imposed under this subsection 19 and the use tax Sales of building materials and supplies to 20 contractors, subcontractors, or builders for the erection of 21 buildings and other structures or for the reconstruction, 22 alteration, expansion, or remodeling of buildings and other 23 structures are retail sales of tangible personal property. 24 Sales of building materials and supplies to contractors, 25 subcontractors, or builders for use in repairs to or for 26 installation in existing buildings and other structures 27 are purchases for resale. Sales of building equipment to 28 contractors, subcontractors, or builders are retails sales of 29 tangible personal property . 30 (2) Where the owner, contractor, subcontractor, or builder 31 is also a retailer holding a sales and use tax permit and 32 transacting retail sales of building materials, supplies, and 33 equipment, the person shall purchase such items of tangible 34 personal property without liability for the tax if such 35 -6- LSB 1390SV (2) 91 jm/jh 6/ 42 S.F. 614 property will be subject to sales tax at the time of resale 1 or subject to use tax at the time the retailer withdraws 2 such property from inventory for use by the retailer in 3 erecting buildings and other structures or for reconstruction, 4 alteration, expansion, or remodeling of buildings and other 5 structures. The tax shall be due in the reporting period 6 when the materials, supplies, or equipment are withdrawn from 7 inventory or when sold at retail. The tax shall not be due when 8 materials and supplies are withdrawn from inventory for use in 9 construction outside of Iowa. 10 (3) The sale of carpeting is not a sale of building 11 materials. Sales of carpeting to owners, contractors, 12 subcontractors, or builders are retail sales of tangible 13 personal property and subject to tax. 14 Sec. 17. Section 423.36, subsection 9, paragraph a, Code 15 2025, is amended to read as follows: 16 a. Except as provided in paragraph âbâ , purchasers, users, 17 and consumers of tangible personal property, specified digital 18 products, or enumerated services taxed pursuant to subchapter 19 II or III of this chapter or chapter 423B may be authorized, 20 pursuant to rules adopted by the director, to remit tax owed 21 directly to the department instead of the tax being collected 22 and paid by the seller. To qualify for a direct pay tax permit, 23 the purchaser, user, or consumer must accrue a tax liability of 24 more than four eight thousand dollars in tax under subchapters 25 II and III in a semimonthly monthly period and make deposits 26 and file returns pursuant to section 423.31 . This authority 27 shall not be granted or exercised except upon application to 28 the director and then only after issuance by the director of a 29 direct pay tax permit. 30 DIVISION VII 31 MOTOR FUEL TAXES 32 Sec. 18. Section 452A.3, subsection 1, paragraph b, 33 unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2025, is amended to read as 34 follows: 35 -7- LSB 1390SV (2) 91 jm/jh 7/ 42 S.F. 614 On and after July 1, 2030, an excise tax of thirty cents is 1 imposed on each gallon of ethanol blended gasoline classified 2 as E-15 or higher. Before July 1, 2030, the rate of the excise 3 tax on ethanol blended gasoline classified as E-15 or higher 4 shall be based on the number of gallons of ethanol blended 5 gasoline classified as E-15 or higher that are distributed 6 in this state as expressed as a percentage of the number of 7 gallons of motor fuel distributed in this state, which is 8 referred to as the distribution percentage. For purposes 9 of this paragraph âbâ , only ethanol blended gasoline and 10 nonblended gasoline, not including aviation gasoline, shall be 11 used in determining the percentage basis for the excise tax. 12 The department shall determine the percentage basis for each 13 determination period beginning January 1 and ending December 31 14 based on information from reports submitted to the department 15 for filing pursuant to section 452A.33 . Before June 1, the 16 department may amend the distribution percentage due to a 17 mistake, if there is a late report filed by a retail dealer 18 to the department under section 452A.33, subsection 1, or if 19 the distribution percentage is not accurate. The rate for the 20 excise tax shall apply for the period beginning July 1 and 21 ending June 30 following the end of the determination period. 22 Before July 1, 2030, the rate of the excise tax on each gallon 23 of ethanol blended gasoline classified as E-15 or higher shall 24 be as follows: 25 Sec. 19. Section 452A.3, subsection 3, paragraph a, 26 subparagraph (2), unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2025, is amended 27 to read as follows: 28 Except as otherwise provided in this section and in this 29 subchapter , this subparagraph shall apply to the excise tax 30 imposed on each gallon of biodiesel blended fuel classified 31 as B-20 or higher used for any purpose for the privilege of 32 operating motor vehicles in this state. On and after July 1, 33 2030, the rate of the excise tax on each gallon of biodiesel 34 blended fuel classified as B-20 or higher is thirty-two and 35 -8- LSB 1390SV (2) 91 jm/jh 8/ 42 S.F. 614 five-tenths cents. Before July 1, 2030, the rate of the excise 1 tax on each gallon of biodiesel blended fuel classified as 2 B-20 or higher shall be based on the number of gallons of 3 biodiesel blended fuel classified as B-20 or higher that are 4 distributed in this state as expressed as a percentage of the 5 number of gallons of special fuel for diesel engines of motor 6 vehicles distributed in this state, which is referred to as 7 the distribution percentage. The department shall determine 8 the percentage basis for each determination period beginning 9 January 1 and ending December 31 based on information from 10 reports submitted to the department for filing pursuant to 11 section 452A.33 . Before June 1, the department may amend the 12 distribution percentage due to a mistake, if there is a late 13 report filed by a retail dealer to the department under section 14 452A.33, subsection 1, or if the distribution percentage is 15 not accurate. The rate of the excise tax shall apply for the 16 period beginning July 1 and ending June 30 following the end of 17 the determination period. Before July 1, 2030, the rate of the 18 excise tax on each gallon of biodiesel blended fuel classified 19 as B-20 or higher shall be as follows: 20 Sec. 20. Section 452A.15, subsection 5, Code 2025, is 21 amended to read as follows: 22 5. The director may impose a civil penalty against any 23 person who fails to timely file the reports or keep the records 24 required under this section . The penalty shall be one hundred 25 dollars for the first violation and shall increase by one 26 hundred dollars for each additional violation occurring in the 27 calendar year in which the first violation occurred. 28 Sec. 21. Section 452A.33, subsection 2, unnumbered 29 paragraph 1, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 30 On or before April 1 the department shall deliver a report 31 to the governor and the legislative services agency. Before 32 June 1, the department may amend the report due to a mistake, 33 if there is a late report by a retail dealer under subsection 34 1, or if the report is not accurate. The report shall compile 35 -9- LSB 1390SV (2) 91 jm/jh 9/ 42 S.F. 614 information reported by retail dealers to the department as 1 provided in this section and shall at least include all of the 2 following: 3 Sec. 22. Section 452A.41, subsection 5, paragraph a, Code 4 2025, is amended to read as follows: 5 a. For the purpose of determining the amount of liability 6 for the electric fuel tax, each dealer and user shall file with 7 the department not later than July 31 for the period beginning 8 January 1 and ending June 30, and not later than January 30 9 31 for the period beginning July 1 and ending December 30 31 , 10 a biannual tax return certified under penalties for false 11 certification. The return shall show, with reference to each 12 location at which fuel is delivered or placed by the dealer or 13 user into the battery or other energy storage device of any 14 electric motor vehicle during the next preceding six calendar 15 months, information as required by the department. On and 16 after January 1, 2026, the department may require by rule that 17 such tax returns be filed quarterly. 18 Sec. 23. Section 452A.44, Code 2025, is amended by adding 19 the following new subsection: 20 NEW SUBSECTION . 4. If electric fuel is sold or dispensed 21 for a nontaxable purpose, the purchaser may complete and 22 provide an exemption certificate produced by the department to 23 the license holder. 24 DIVISION VIII 25 INHERITANCE TAX ââ FUTURE CODE CHANGES DUE TO REPEAL 26 Sec. 24. Section 12D.9, subsection 3, Code 2025, is amended 27 to read as follows: 28 3. State For a death occurring before January 1, 2025, state 29 inheritance tax treatment of interests in Iowa educational 30 savings plans shall be as provided in section 450.4, subsection 31 8 . This subsection shall apply to all Iowa educational savings 32 plans existing on or after July 1, 1998. 33 Sec. 25. Section 12I.8, subsection 3, Code 2025, is amended 34 to read as follows: 35 -10- LSB 1390SV (2) 91 jm/jh 10/ 42 S.F. 614 3. State For a death occurring before January 1, 2025, state 1 inheritance tax treatment of interests in Iowa ABLE savings 2 plans shall be as provided in section 450.4, subsection 9 . 3 Sec. 26. Section 12I.10, subsection 3, Code 2025, is amended 4 to read as follows: 5 3. State For a death occurring before January 1, 2025, state 6 inheritance tax treatment of interests in the qualified ABLE 7 program with which the state has contracted pursuant to this 8 section shall be as provided in section 450.4, subsection 9 . 9 Sec. 27. Section 16.177, subsection 8, Code 2025, is amended 10 to read as follows: 11 8. Bonds issued under this section are declared to be issued 12 for an essential public and governmental purpose and all bonds 13 issued under this section shall be exempt from taxation by the 14 state of Iowa and the interest on the bonds shall be exempt 15 from the state income tax and the any state inheritance tax. 16 Sec. 28. Section 321.47, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code 17 2025, is amended to read as follows: 18 a. The persons entitled under the laws of descent and 19 distribution to the possession and ownership of a vehicle owned 20 in whole or in part by a decedent who died intestate, upon 21 filing an affidavit stating the name and date of death of the 22 decedent, the right to possession and ownership of the persons 23 filing the affidavit, and that there has been no administration 24 of the decedentâs estate, which instrument must also contain 25 an agreement by the affiant to indemnify creditors of the 26 decedent who would be entitled to levy execution upon the motor 27 vehicle to the extent of the value of the motor vehicle, shall, 28 upon complying with the other title transfer requirements of 29 this chapter , be issued a registration card for the decedentâs 30 interest in the vehicle and a certificate of title to the 31 vehicle. If a decedent died testate, and either the will is 32 not probated or is admitted to probate without administration, 33 the persons entitled to the possession and ownership of 34 a vehicle owned in whole or in part by the decedent may 35 -11- LSB 1390SV (2) 91 jm/jh 11/ 42 S.F. 614 file an affidavit and, upon complying with the other title 1 transfer requirements of this chapter , shall be issued a 2 registration card for the decedentâs interest in the vehicle 3 and a certificate of title to the vehicle. The affidavit 4 must contain the same information and indemnity agreement 5 as is required in cases of intestacy under this subsection . 6 Chapter 450 is not For a death occurring before January 1, 7 2025, a requirement of chapter 450 shall not be considered 8 satisfied by the filing of the affidavit provided for in this 9 subsection . If, from the records in the office of the county 10 treasurer, there appear to be any liens on the vehicle, the 11 certificate of title must contain a statement of the liens 12 unless the application is accompanied by proper evidence of 13 the satisfaction or extinction of such liens. Evidence of 14 extinction includes but is not limited to an affidavit of the 15 applicant stating that a security interest was foreclosed as 16 provided in chapter 554, article 9, part 6 . The department 17 shall waive the certificate of title fee and surcharge required 18 under sections 321.20 , 321.20A , 321.23 , 321.46 , 321.52 , and 19 321.52A if the person entitled to possession and ownership of 20 a vehicle, as provided in this subsection , is the surviving 21 spouse of a decedent. 22 Sec. 29. Section 331.602, subsection 23, Code 2025, is 23 amended to read as follows: 24 23. Forward For deaths occurring before January 1, 2025, 25 forward to the director of revenue a copy of any deed, bill of 26 sale, or other transfer which shows that it is made or intended 27 to take effect at or after the death of the person executing 28 the instrument as provided in section 450.81 . 29 Sec. 30. Section 331.756, subsection 57, Code 2025, is 30 amended to read as follows: 31 57. Represent For deaths occurring before January 1, 2025, 32 represent the state in litigation relating to the inheritance 33 tax if requested by the department of revenue as provided in 34 section 450.1 . 35 -12- LSB 1390SV (2) 91 jm/jh 12/ 42 S.F. 614 Sec. 31. Section 421.27, subsection 1, paragraph d, 1 subparagraph (13), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 (13) That For a death occurring before January 1, 2025, 3 that an Iowa inheritance tax return is filed for an estate 4 within the later of nine months from the date of death or sixty 5 days from the filing of a disclaimer by the beneficiary of the 6 estate refusing to take the property or right or interest in 7 the property. 8 Sec. 32. Section 421.60, subsection 2, paragraph c, 9 subparagraph (1), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 10 (1) If the notice of assessment or denial of a claim for 11 refund relates to a tax return filed pursuant to section 12 422.14 , or pursuant to chapter 450 for a death occurring before 13 January 1, 2025, by the taxpayer which designates an individual 14 as an authorized representative of the taxpayer with respect to 15 that return, or if a power of attorney has been filed with the 16 department by the taxpayer which designates an individual as 17 an authorized representative of the taxpayer with respect to 18 any tax that is included in the notice of assessment or denial 19 of a claim for refund, a copy of the notice together with any 20 additional information required to be sent to the taxpayer 21 shall be sent to the authorized representative as well. 22 Sec. 33. Section 422.27, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended 23 to read as follows: 24 1. A final account of a personal representative , as defined 25 in section 450.1 , shall not be allowed by any court unless the 26 account shows, and the judge of the court finds, that all taxes 27 imposed by this subchapter upon the personal representative, 28 which have become payable, have been paid, and that all taxes 29 which may become due are secured by bond or deposit, or are 30 otherwise secured. The certificate of acquittances of the 31 department of revenue is conclusive as to the payment of the 32 tax to the extent of the acquittance. This subsection does 33 not apply if all property in the estate of a decedent is 34 held in joint tenancy with right of survivorship by husband 35 -13- LSB 1390SV (2) 91 jm/jh 13/ 42 S.F. 614 and wife alone. For purposes of this subsection, âpersonal 1 representativeâ means an administrator, executor, or trustee as 2 each is defined in section 633.3. 3 Sec. 34. Section 496C.14, subsection 6, paragraph h, Code 4 2025, is amended to read as follows: 5 h. Notwithstanding the provisions of this section , 6 payment of any part of the purchase price for shares of a 7 deceased shareholder shall not be required until the executor 8 or administrator of the deceased shareholder provides 9 any indemnity, release, or other document from any taxing 10 authority, which is reasonably necessary to protect the 11 corporation against liability for any estate , inheritance, and 12 death taxes tax, or any inheritance tax for a death occurring 13 before January 1, 2025 . 14 Sec. 35. Section 524.805, subsection 8, Code 2025, is 15 amended to read as follows: 16 8. A state bank may receive deposits from one or more 17 persons with the provision that upon the death of the 18 depositors the deposit account shall be the property of the 19 person or persons designated by the deceased depositors as 20 shown on the deposit account records of the state bank. After 21 payment by the state bank, the proceeds shall remain subject 22 to the any debts of the decedent and the any payment of Iowa 23 inheritance tax , if any for a death occurring prior to January 24 1, 2025 . A state bank paying the person or persons designated 25 shall not be liable as a result of that action for any debts 26 of the decedent or for any estate, inheritance, or succession 27 taxes which may be due this state. 28 Sec. 36. Section 541A.2, subsection 6, unnumbered paragraph 29 1, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 30 An individual development account closed in accordance 31 with this subsection is not subject to the limitations and 32 benefits provided by this chapter but is subject to state tax 33 in accordance with the provisions of section 422.7, subsection 34 17 , and in accordance with the provisions of section 450.4, 35 -14- LSB 1390SV (2) 91 jm/jh 14/ 42 S.F. 614 subsection 6 , for a death occurring before January 1, 2025 . An 1 individual development account may be closed for any of the 2 following reasons: 3 Sec. 37. Section 602.8102, subsection 63, Code 2025, is 4 amended to read as follows: 5 63. Carry out duties relating to the inheritance tax as 6 provided in chapter 450 for deaths occurring before January 1, 7 2025 . 8 Sec. 38. Section 633.21, Code 2025, is amended to read as 9 follows: 10 633.21 Appraisersâ fees and refereesâ fees fixed by rule. 11 The district judges of each judicial district shall by rule 12 fix the fees of probate referees, and also provide, insofar as 13 practicable, a uniform schedule of compensation for inheritance 14 tax appraisers, other appraisers, brokers, and agents employed 15 at estate expense. 16 Sec. 39. Section 633.31, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code 17 2025, is amended to read as follows: 18 a. For services performed in short form probates 19 pursuant to sections 450.22 and 450.44 for deaths occurring 20 before January 1, 2025 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 15.00 21 Sec. 40. Section 633.356, subsection 1, unnumbered 22 paragraph 1, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 23 When the gross value of the decedentâs personal property 24 that would otherwise be distributed by will or intestate 25 succession is or has been, at any time since the decedentâs 26 death, fifty thousand dollars or less and there is no real 27 property , or for deaths occurring before January 1, 2025, the 28 real property passes to persons exempt from inheritance tax 29 as joint tenants with full rights of survivorship pursuant to 30 chapter 450 , and if forty days have elapsed since the death of 31 the decedent, a successor as defined in subsection 2 may, by 32 furnishing an affidavit prepared pursuant to subsection 3 or 33 8 , and without procuring letters of appointment, do any of the 34 following with respect to one or more items of such personal 35 -15- LSB 1390SV (2) 91 jm/jh 15/ 42 S.F. 614 property: 1 Sec. 41. Section 633.356, subsection 3, paragraph a, 2 subparagraph (3), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 3 (3) That the gross value of the decedentâs personal property 4 that would otherwise be distributed by will or intestate 5 succession is, or has been at any time since the decedentâs 6 death, fifty thousand dollars or less and there is no real 7 property , or for deaths occurring before January 1, 2025, the 8 real property passes to persons exempt from inheritance tax 9 as joint tenants with full rights of survivorship pursuant to 10 chapter 450 . 11 Sec. 42. Section 633.356, subsection 3, paragraph a, 12 subparagraph (10), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 13 (10) That no inheritance or other taxes are owed to the 14 department of revenue for a death occurring prior to January 1, 15 2025 , or if taxes are owed, that the taxes will be paid to the 16 extent of funds received pursuant to the affidavit. 17 Sec. 43. Section 633.356, subsection 9, Code 2025, is 18 amended to read as follows: 19 9. Upon receipt of an affidavit under subsection 3 and 20 reasonable proof under subsection 5 of the identity of each 21 successor seeking distribution by virtue of the affidavit, 22 the holder of the property shall disclose to the affiant 23 whether the value of the property held by the holder is, or has 24 been at any time since the decedentâs death, fifty thousand 25 dollars or less. An affidavit furnished for the purpose of 26 determining whether the value of the property is, or has 27 been at any time since the decedentâs death, fifty thousand 28 dollars or less need not contain the language required under 29 subsection 3 , paragraph âaâ , subparagraph (3), but shall state 30 that the affiant reasonably believes that the gross value 31 of the decedentâs personal property that would otherwise be 32 distributed by will or intestate succession is, or has been at 33 any time since the decedentâs death, fifty thousand dollars 34 or less and there is no real property or for deaths occurring 35 -16- LSB 1390SV (2) 91 jm/jh 16/ 42 S.F. 614 before January 1, 2025, the real property passes to persons 1 exempt from inheritance tax as joint tenants with full rights 2 of survivorship pursuant to chapter 450 . 3 Sec. 44. Section 633.361, subsection 12, Code 2025, is 4 amended to read as follows: 5 12. A listing of all other items, with estimated values, 6 which are subject to Iowa inheritance tax for deaths occurring 7 before January 1, 2025, or federal estate tax. 8 Sec. 45. Section 633.365, Code 2025, is amended to read as 9 follows: 10 633.365 Appraisement. 11 Property belonging to the estate need not be appraised 12 unless required for inheritance tax purposes for deaths 13 occurring before January 1, 2025 , under the provisions of this 14 probate code, or by order of court. 15 Sec. 46. Section 633.399, Code 2025, is amended to read as 16 follows: 17 633.399 Report for approval. 18 After making any such sale, mortgage, exchange or lease 19 of real property, the personal representative shall make 20 a verified report thereof to the court. The court shall 21 examine said report, and if satisfied that the sale, mortgage, 22 exchange, or lease has been at a price and upon terms 23 advantageous to the estate, and, in all respects, made in 24 conformity with law, and that it ought to be confirmed, shall 25 confirm the same and order the personal representative to 26 deliver a deed, mortgage, lease or other proper instruments 27 to the persons entitled thereto; provided, however, that in 28 the event said real property has been sold at private sale 29 without an appraisal for inheritance tax purposes for a death 30 occurring before January 1, 2025, or for purpose of such sale, 31 or, if it has been so appraised and has been sold at private 32 sale for less than the appraised value thereof, then, upon the 33 filing of such report, the court may enter an order fixing a 34 time and place for hearing thereon and prescribe a notice of 35 -17- LSB 1390SV (2) 91 jm/jh 17/ 42 S.F. 614 such hearing to be served upon all interested persons, any one 1 of whom, prior to the time fixed for such hearing, may file 2 written objections to the entry of an order approving said 3 sale. If not satisfied that the sale, mortgage, exchange, or 4 lease has been made in conformity with law and that it is to the 5 best interests of the estate, the court may reject the sale, 6 mortgage, exchange, or lease, and enter such orders as the 7 court may deem advisable. 8 Sec. 47. Section 633.477, subsection 10, Code 2025, is 9 amended to read as follows: 10 10. A statement as to whether or not all statutory 11 requirements pertaining to taxes have been complied with 12 including whether the federal estate tax due has been paid, 13 whether a lien continues to exist for any federal estate tax, 14 and whether inheritance tax was paid or a return was filed in 15 this state for a death occurring before January 1, 2025 . 16 Sec. 48. Section 633.479, subsection 2, paragraph a, 17 subparagraph (5), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 18 (5) Compliance with sections section 422.27 , and section 19 450.58 for deaths occurring before January 1, 2025, have been 20 fulfilled. 21 Sec. 49. Section 633.481, Code 2025, is amended to read as 22 follows: 23 633.481 Certificate to county recorder for tax purposes 24 without administration. 25 When an inventory or report is filed under section 450.22 for 26 deaths occurring before January 1, 2025 , without administration 27 of the estate of the decedent, the heir or heirâs attorney 28 shall prepare and deliver to the county recorder of the county 29 in which the real estate is situated a certificate pertaining 30 to each parcel of real estate described in the inventory or 31 report. Any fees for certificates or recording fees required 32 by this section or section 633.480 shall be assessed as costs 33 of administration. The fees for recording and indexing the 34 instrument shall be as provided in section 331.604 . The county 35 -18- LSB 1390SV (2) 91 jm/jh 18/ 42 S.F. 614 recorder shall deliver the certificates to the county auditor 1 as provided in section 558.58 . 2 Sec. 50. Section 635.7, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended 3 to read as follows: 4 1. The personal representative is required to file the 5 report and inventory for which provision is made in section 6 633.361 , including all probate and nonprobate assets. This 7 chapter does not exempt the personal representative from 8 complying with the requirements of section 422.27 , 450.22 , 9 450.58 , 633.480 , or 633.481 , and the administration of an 10 estate whether converted to or from a small estate shall be 11 considered one proceeding pursuant to section 633.330 . For 12 a death occurring before January 1, 2025, this chapter does 13 not exempt the personal representative from complying with the 14 requirements of section 450.22 or 450.58. 15 Sec. 51. Section 635.8, subsection 1, paragraph e, Code 16 2025, is amended to read as follows: 17 e. A statement that all statutory requirements pertaining to 18 taxes have been complied with, including whether federal estate 19 tax due has been paid, whether a lien continues to exist for 20 any federal estate tax, and whether inheritance tax was paid 21 or a tax return was filed in this state for a death occurring 22 before January 1, 2025 . 23 Sec. 52. Section 654.16, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended 24 to read as follows: 25 2. If a homestead is designated, the court shall determine 26 the fair market value of the designated homestead before 27 the sheriffâs sale. The court may consult with the county 28 appraisers appointed pursuant to section 450.24 for deaths 29 occurring before January 1, 2025 , or with one or more 30 independent appraisers, to determine the fair market value of 31 the designated homestead. 32 Sec. 53. EFFECTIVE DATE. This division of this Act, being 33 deemed of immediate importance, takes effect upon enactment. 34 Sec. 54. RETROACTIVE APPLICABILITY. This division of this 35 -19- LSB 1390SV (2) 91 jm/jh 19/ 42 S.F. 614 Act applies retroactively to January 1, 2025, to the estates of 1 decedents dying on or after January 1, 2025. 2 DIVISION IX 3 LUMP SUM DISTRIBUTION OF RETIREMENT INCOME 4 Sec. 55. Section 422.5, subsection 7, Code 2025, is amended 5 to read as follows: 6 7. a. In addition to the other taxes imposed by this 7 section , a tax is imposed , except under paragraph âbâ , on the 8 amount of a lump sum distribution for which the taxpayer has 9 elected under section 402(e) of the Internal Revenue Code to 10 be separately taxed for federal income tax purposes for the 11 tax year. The rate of tax is equal to twenty-five percent of 12 the separate federal tax imposed on the amount of the lump 13 sum distribution. A nonresident is liable for this tax only 14 on that portion of the lump sum distribution allocable to 15 Iowa. The total amount of the lump sum distribution subject 16 to separate federal tax shall be included in net income for 17 purposes of determining eligibility under subsections 2 and 3 , 18 as applicable , except the amount of the lump sum distribution 19 exempt from state tax in paragraph âbâ shall not be included . 20 b. The amount of a lump sum distribution that is received 21 from a governmental or other pension or retirement plan, 22 including defined benefit or defined contribution plans, 23 annuities, individual retirement accounts, plans maintained or 24 contributed to by an employer, or maintained or contributed 25 to by a self-employed person as an employer, and deferred 26 compensation plans or any earnings attributable to the deferred 27 compensation plans is exempt from state tax imposed under 28 paragraph âaâ if received by a person who is disabled, or is 29 fifty-five years of age or older, or is the surviving spouse of 30 an individual or is a survivor having an insurable interest in 31 an individual who would have qualified for the exemption under 32 this subsection for the tax year. 33 Sec. 56. EFFECTIVE DATE. This division of this Act, being 34 deemed of immediate importance, takes effect upon enactment. 35 -20- LSB 1390SV (2) 91 jm/jh 20/ 42 S.F. 614 Sec. 57. RETROACTIVE APPLICABILITY. This division of this 1 Act applies retroactively to January 1, 2025, for tax years 2 beginning on or after that date. 3 DIVISION X 4 ESTIMATED TAX THRESHOLD 5 Sec. 58. Section 422.16, subsection 12, paragraph a, 6 subparagraph (1), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 7 (1) Taxpayers filing a return shall make estimated tax 8 payments if their Iowa income tax liability can reasonably be 9 expected to amount to two hundred one thousand dollars or more 10 for the year. 11 Sec. 59. EFFECTIVE DATE. This division of this Act takes 12 effect January 1, 2026. 13 Sec. 60. APPLICABILITY. This division of this Act applies 14 to tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2026. 15 DIVISION XI 16 TAX EXPENDITURE REVIEW 17 Sec. 61. Section 2.48, subsection 2, paragraph a, 18 subparagraph (1), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 19 (1) The department administering a tax expenditure 20 described in subsection 3 shall engage in a review of the tax 21 expenditure based upon the schedule in subsection 3 , unless the 22 tax expenditure is repealed . For purposes of this section, 23 a tax expenditure is considered repealed if a zero amount 24 remains available to be awarded, issued, or claimed under law. 25 If multiple departments administer the tax expenditure, the 26 departments shall cooperate in the review. 27 Sec. 62. Section 2.48, subsection 3, paragraph b, 28 subparagraph (1), Code 2025, is amended by striking the 29 subparagraph. 30 Sec. 63. Section 2.48, subsection 3, paragraph d, 31 subparagraphs (3) and (5), Code 2025, are amended by striking 32 the subparagraphs. 33 Sec. 64. Section 2.48, subsection 3, paragraph e, 34 subparagraph (4), Code 2025, is amended by striking the 35 -21- LSB 1390SV (2) 91 jm/jh 21/ 42 S.F. 614 subparagraph. 1 Sec. 65. 2017 Iowa Acts, chapter 29, section 169, is amended 2 to read as follows: 3 SEC. 169. EFFECTIVE DATE. The following provision or 4 provisions in Division I of this Act take effect July 1, 2030 5 2039 : 6 1. The section of this Act amending section 2.48, subsection 7 3, paragraph âhâ. 8 DIVISION XII 9 LIMITATIONS ON SALES TAX EXEMPTIONS AND REFUNDS AND TRANSFERS 10 TO THE ENERGY INFRASTRUCTURE REVOLVING FUND 11 Sec. 66. Section 423.2A, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended 12 by adding the following new paragraph: 13 NEW PARAGRAPH . h. Beginning July 1, 2025, transfer to 14 the energy infrastructure revolving loan fund under section 15 476.46A the portion of sales tax revenues attributable to the 16 expiration of the exemption period specified in all of the 17 following: 18 (1) Section 423.3, subsection 92, paragraph âaâ , 19 subparagraph (2) or (3). 20 (2) Section 423.3, subsection 93, paragraph âaâ , 21 subparagraph (2) or (3). 22 (3) Section 423.3, subsection 95, paragraph âaâ , 23 subparagraph (2) or (3). 24 Sec. 67. Section 423.3, subsection 92, paragraph a, 25 subparagraphs (2) and (3), Code 2025, are amended to read as 26 follows: 27 (2) (a) The sales price of backup power generation fuel, 28 that is purchased by a web search portal business for use in 29 the items listed in subparagraph (1). 30 (b) The duration of the exemption allowed under this 31 subparagraph shall be for the following time periods: 32 (i) For backup power generation fuel purchased in 33 connection with real property for a web search portal that 34 began operating prior to the effective date of this division of 35 -22- LSB 1390SV (2) 91 jm/jh 22/ 42 S.F. 614 this Act, there shall be no limitation on the duration of the 1 exemption. 2 (ii) For backup power generation fuel purchased by a 3 web search portal in connection with real property with new 4 construction upon the property completed on or after the 5 effective date of this division of this Act, or additions 6 upon existing property on or after the effective date of this 7 division of this Act, and such property is located entirely 8 or in part within a city having a population of more than 9 thirty thousand, according to the most recent decennial federal 10 census, the first ten years of operation in connection with the 11 new construction or addition upon the existing property. 12 (iii) For backup power generation fuel purchased by a 13 web search portal in connection with real property with new 14 construction upon the property completed on or after the 15 effective date of this division of this Act, or additions 16 upon existing property on or after the effective date of this 17 division of this Act, and such property of such a web portal 18 business is not located entirely or in part within a city 19 having a population of more than thirty thousand, according to 20 the most recent decennial federal census, the first fifteen 21 years of operation in connection with the new construction or 22 addition upon the existing property. 23 (3) (a) The sales price of electricity purchased for use in 24 providing a web search portal. 25 (b) The duration of the exemption allowed under this 26 subparagraph shall be for the following time periods: 27 (i) For electricity purchased in connection with real 28 property for web search portals that began operating prior to 29 the effective date of this division of this Act, there shall be 30 no limitation on the duration of the exemption. 31 (ii) For electricity purchased by a web search portal in 32 connection with real property with new construction upon the 33 property completed on or after the effective date of this 34 division of this Act, or additions upon existing property on or 35 -23- LSB 1390SV (2) 91 jm/jh 23/ 42 S.F. 614 after the effective date of this division of this Act, and such 1 property is located entirely or in part within a city having 2 a population of more than thirty thousand, according to the 3 most recent decennial federal census, the first ten years of 4 operation in connection with the new construction or addition 5 upon the existing property. 6 (iii) For electricity purchased by a web search portal 7 in connection with real property with new construction upon 8 the property completed on or after the effective date of this 9 division of this Act, or additions upon existing property on 10 or after the effective date of this division of this Act, and 11 such property is not located entirely or in part within a city 12 having a population of more than thirty thousand, according to 13 the most recent decennial federal census, the first fifteen 14 years of operation in connection with the new construction or 15 addition upon the existing property. 16 Sec. 68. Section 423.3, subsection 92, paragraph b, Code 17 2025, is amended by adding the following new subparagraphs: 18 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (5) The web search portal business 19 shall register with the department as a web search portal. 20 To maintain its registration, the web search portal business 21 shall file an annual report with the department, by January 31, 22 2026, and by each January 31 thereafter. The annual report 23 shall describe the backup power generation fuel and electricity 24 purchased and used in the previous calendar year for the 25 purposes described in paragraph âaâ , subparagraphs (2) and (3), 26 and any other information the department requires. 27 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (6) Beginning after January 31, 2026, 28 when purchasing exempt property under paragraph âaâ , the web 29 search portal business shall present an exemption certificate, 30 issued annually to the web search portal business after 31 filing the annual report pursuant to subparagraph (5), to the 32 retailer. 33 Sec. 69. Section 423.3, subsection 92, paragraph e, Code 34 2025, is amended by adding the following new subparagraph: 35 -24- LSB 1390SV (2) 91 jm/jh 24/ 42 S.F. 614 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (03) âSite preparation activitiesâ means 1 the same as defined in subsection 95. 2 Sec. 70. Section 423.3, subsection 93, paragraph a, 3 subparagraphs (2) and (3), Code 2025, are amended to read as 4 follows: 5 (2) (a) The sales price of backup power generation fuel, 6 that is purchased by a web search portal business for use in 7 the items listed in subparagraph (1). 8 (b) The duration of the exemption allowed under this 9 subparagraph shall be for the following time periods: 10 (i) For backup power generation fuel purchased and used 11 in connection with real property for a web search portal 12 business that began operating prior to the effective date of 13 this division of this Act, there shall be no limitation on the 14 duration of the exemption. 15 (ii) For backup power generation fuel purchased by a web 16 search portal business in connection with real property with 17 new construction upon the property completed on or after the 18 effective date of this division of this Act, or additions 19 upon existing property on or after the effective date of this 20 division of this Act, and such property is located entirely 21 or in part within a city having a population of more than 22 thirty thousand, according to the most recent decennial federal 23 census, the first ten years of operation in connection with the 24 new construction or addition to the existing property. 25 (iii) For backup power generation fuel purchased by a web 26 search portal business in connection with real property with 27 new construction upon the property completed on or after the 28 effective date of this division of this Act, or additions 29 upon existing real property on or after the effective date 30 of this division of this Act, and such real property is not 31 located entirely or in part within a city having a population 32 of more than thirty thousand, according to the most recent 33 decennial federal census, the first fifteen years of operation 34 in connection with the new construction or addition to the 35 -25- LSB 1390SV (2) 91 jm/jh 25/ 42 S.F. 614 existing property. 1 (3) (a) The sales price of electricity purchased for use by 2 a web search portal business. 3 (b) The duration of the exemption allowed under this 4 subparagraph shall be for the following time periods: 5 (i) For electricity purchased and used in connection with 6 real property for a web search portal business that began 7 operating prior to the effective date of this division of 8 this Act, there shall be no limitation on the duration of the 9 exemption. 10 (ii) For electricity purchased by a web search portal 11 business in connection with real property with new construction 12 upon the property completed on or after the effective date of 13 this division of this Act, or additions upon existing property 14 on or after the effective date of this division of this Act, 15 and such property is located entirely or in part within a city 16 having a population of more than thirty thousand, according 17 to the most recent decennial federal census, the first ten 18 years of operation in connection with the new construction or 19 addition to the existing property. 20 (iii) For electricity purchased by a web search portal 21 business in connection with real property with new construction 22 upon the property completed on or after the effective date of 23 this division of this Act, or additions upon existing property 24 on or after the effective date of this division of this Act, 25 and such property is not located entirely or in part within 26 a city having a population of more than thirty thousand, 27 according to the most recent decennial federal census, the 28 first fifteen years of operation in connection with the new 29 construction or addition to the existing property. 30 Sec. 71. Section 423.3, subsection 93, paragraph b, Code 31 2025, is amended by adding the following new subparagraphs: 32 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (5) The web search portal business shall 33 register with the department as a web search portal business. 34 To maintain its registration, the web search portal business 35 -26- LSB 1390SV (2) 91 jm/jh 26/ 42 S.F. 614 shall file an annual report with the department, by January 31, 1 2026, and by each January 31 thereafter. The annual report 2 shall describe the backup power generation fuel and electricity 3 purchased and used in the previous calendar year for the 4 purposes described in paragraph âaâ , subparagraphs (2) and (3), 5 and any other information the department requires. 6 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (6) Beginning after January 31, 2026, 7 when purchasing exempt property under paragraph âaâ , the web 8 search portal business shall present an exemption certificate, 9 issued annually to the web search portal business after filing 10 the annual report pursuant to subparagraph (5) to the retailer. 11 Sec. 72. Section 423.3, subsection 93, paragraph e, Code 12 2025, is amended by adding the following new subparagraph: 13 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (03) âSite preparation activitiesâ means 14 the same as defined in subsection 95. 15 Sec. 73. Section 423.3, subsection 95, paragraph a, 16 subparagraphs (2) and (3), Code 2025, are amended to read as 17 follows: 18 (2) (a) The sales price of backup power generation fuel 19 that is purchased by a data center business for use in the 20 items listed in subparagraph (1). 21 (b) The duration of the exemption allowed under this 22 subparagraph shall be for the following time periods: 23 (i) For backup power generation fuel purchased in 24 connection with real property the data center business began 25 operating prior to the effective date of this division of 26 this Act, there shall be no limitation on the duration of the 27 exemption. 28 (ii) For backup power generation fuel purchased by a 29 data center business in connection with real property with 30 new construction upon the property completed on or after the 31 effective date of this division of this Act, or additions 32 upon existing property on or after the effective date of this 33 division of this Act, and such property is located entirely 34 or in part within a city having a population of more than 35 -27- LSB 1390SV (2) 91 jm/jh 27/ 42 S.F. 614 thirty thousand, according to the most recent decennial federal 1 census, the first ten years of operation in connection with the 2 new construction or addition upon the existing property. 3 (iii) For backup power generation fuel purchased by a 4 data center business in connection with real property with 5 new construction upon the property completed on or after the 6 effective date of this division of this Act, or additions 7 upon existing property on or after the effective date of this 8 division of this Act, and such property is not located entirely 9 or in part within a city having a population of more than 10 thirty thousand, according to the most recent decennial federal 11 census, the first fifteen years of operation in connection with 12 the new construction or addition upon the existing property. 13 (3) (a) The sales price of electricity purchased for use by 14 a data center business. 15 (b) The duration of the exemption allowed under this 16 subparagraph shall be for the following time periods: 17 (i) For electricity purchased in connection with real 18 property the data center business began operating prior the 19 effective date of this division of this Act, there shall be no 20 limitation on the duration of the exemption. 21 (ii) For electricity purchased by a data center business 22 in connection with real property with new construction upon 23 the property completed on or after the effective date of this 24 division of this Act, or additions upon existing property on or 25 after the effective date of this division of this Act, and such 26 property is located entirely or in part within a city having 27 a population of more than thirty thousand, according to the 28 most recent decennial federal census, the first ten years of 29 operation in connection with the new construction or addition 30 to the existing property. 31 (iii) For electricity purchased by a data center business 32 in connection with real property with new construction upon 33 the property completed on or after the effective date of this 34 division of this Act, or additions upon existing property on 35 -28- LSB 1390SV (2) 91 jm/jh 28/ 42 S.F. 614 or after the effective date of this division of this Act, and 1 such property is not located in part within a city having a 2 population of more than thirty thousand, according to the most 3 recent decennial federal census, the first fifteen years of 4 operation in connection with the new construction or addition 5 to the property. 6 Sec. 74. Section 423.3, subsection 95, paragraph b, 7 subparagraph (3), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 8 (3) The data center business shall make a minimum investment 9 in an Iowa physical location of two hundred million dollars 10 within the first six years of operation in Iowa beginning with 11 the date the data center business initiates site preparation 12 activities , or the beginning date of the initial lease term 13 of a data center, as applicable . The minimum investment 14 includes the initial investment, including land and subsequent 15 acquisition of additional adjacent land and subsequent 16 investment at the Iowa location. 17 Sec. 75. Section 423.3, subsection 95, paragraph b, Code 18 2025, is amended by adding the following new subparagraphs: 19 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (5) The data center business shall 20 register with the department as a data center business. To 21 maintain its registration, the data center business shall file 22 an annual report with the department, by January 31, 2026, 23 and by each January 31 thereafter. The annual report shall 24 describe the backup power generation fuel and electricity 25 purchased in the previous calendar year for the purposes 26 described in paragraph âaâ , subparagraphs (2) and (3), and any 27 other information the department requires. 28 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (6) Beginning after January 31, 2026, 29 when purchasing exempt property under paragraph âaâ , the data 30 center business shall present an exemption certificate, issued 31 annually to the data center business after filing the annual 32 report pursuant to subparagraph (5), to the retailer. 33 Sec. 76. Section 423.3, subsection 95, paragraphs c and d, 34 Code 2025, are amended to read as follows: 35 -29- LSB 1390SV (2) 91 jm/jh 29/ 42 S.F. 614 c. This exemption applies from the date of the initial 1 investment in , or the initiation of site preparation activities 2 for the data center business facility , or from the beginning 3 date of the initial lease term, as described in paragraph âbâ . 4 d. Failure to meet eighty percent of the minimum investment 5 amount requirement specified in paragraph âbâ within the first 6 six years of operation from the date the data center business 7 initiates site preparation activities or from the beginning 8 date of the initial lease term, as applicable, will result 9 in the data center business losing the right to claim this 10 data center business exemption and the data center business 11 shall pay all sales or use tax that would have been due on the 12 purchase or use of the items listed in this exemption, plus any 13 applicable penalty and interest imposed by statute. 14 Sec. 77. Section 423.3, subsection 95, Code 2025, is amended 15 by adding the following new paragraph: 16 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0d. A data center business leasing space to 17 operate a data center as a lessee is eligible to qualify for 18 the exemption under this subsection. 19 Sec. 78. Section 423.3, subsection 95, paragraph e, 20 subparagraphs (1) and (2), Code 2025, are amended to read as 21 follows: 22 (1) âData centerâ means a building rehabilitated or 23 constructed to house a group of networked server computers 24 in one physical location in order to centralize the storage, 25 management, and dissemination of data and information 26 pertaining to a particular business, taxonomy, or body of 27 knowledge. A data center businessâs facility typically 28 includes the mechanical and electrical systems, redundant 29 or backup power supplies, redundant data communications 30 connections, environmental controls, and fire suppression 31 systems. A data center businessâs facility also includes a 32 restricted access area employing advanced physical security 33 measures such as video surveillance systems and card-based 34 security or biometric security access systems. âData centerâ 35 -30- LSB 1390SV (2) 91 jm/jh 30/ 42 S.F. 614 includes the lease of a business facility leased by an entity 1 operating a data center business at that location. 2 (2) âData center businessâ means an entity whose business 3 among other businesses, is to operate or lease a data center. 4 Sec. 79. Section 423.3, subsection 95, paragraph e, Code 5 2025, is amended by adding the following new subparagraph: 6 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (3) âSite preparation activitiesâ means 7 actions that are taken prior to beginning construction or 8 rehabilitation of the building that will house the data center 9 and in preparation for the construction or rehabilitation. 10 âSite preparation activitiesâ include but are hot limited to 11 grading and clearing of land, storing of construction equipment 12 including temporary buildings and trailers for equipment 13 storage and for construction offices, exploratory excavating 14 and borings to assess the sustainability of a site, and 15 clearing the site of existing vegetation, old buildings, or 16 old equipment. âSite preparation activitiesâ does not include 17 the purchase or installation of the tangible personal property 18 described in paragraph âaâ , subparagraph (1). 19 Sec. 80. Section 423.4, subsection 7, paragraph b, 20 subparagraph (1), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 21 (1) The data center business shall make an investment 22 in an Iowa physical location within the first three years of 23 operation in Iowa beginning with the date on which the data 24 center business initiates site preparation activities , or 25 within three years of the beginning date of the initial lease 26 term of the data center, as applicable . 27 Sec. 81. Section 423.4, subsection 7, Code 2025, is amended 28 by adding the following new paragraph: 29 NEW PARAGRAPH . g. As used in this subsection, âsite 30 preparation activitiesâ means the same as defined in section 31 423.3, subsection 95. 32 Sec. 82. Section 423.4, subsection 8, paragraph b, 33 subparagraph (2), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 34 (2) The data center business shall make a minimum 35 -31- LSB 1390SV (2) 91 jm/jh 31/ 42 S.F. 614 investment of at least ten million dollars, in the case of new 1 construction, or at least five million dollars in the case 2 of a rehabilitated building, in an Iowa physical location 3 within the first six years of operation in Iowa, beginning 4 with the date on which the data center business initiates site 5 preparation activities or the beginning date of the initial 6 lease term, as applicable . The minimum investment includes the 7 initial investment, including the value of a lease agreement 8 or the amount invested in land and subsequent acquisition of 9 additional adjacent land and subsequent investment at the Iowa 10 location. 11 Sec. 83. Section 423.4, subsection 8, Code 2025, is amended 12 by adding the following new paragraph: 13 NEW PARAGRAPH . h. As used in this subsection, âsite 14 preparation activitiesâ means the same as defined in section 15 423.3, subsection 95. 16 Sec. 84. Section 423.43, subsection 1, paragraph a, Code 17 2025, is amended to read as follows: 18 a. Except as provided in subsection 2 subsections 2 and 3 , 19 all revenue arising under the operation of the use tax under 20 subchapter III shall be deposited into the general fund of the 21 state. 22 Sec. 85. Section 423.43, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 23 following new subsection: 24 NEW SUBSECTION . 3. All revenues derived from the use tax 25 imposed pursuant to section 423.5 and attributable to the 26 expiration of the exemption time period specified in all of the 27 following shall be transferred to the energy infrastructure 28 revolving loan fund under section 476.46A: 29 a. Section 423.3, subsection 92, paragraph âaâ , subparagraph 30 (2) or (3). 31 b. Section 423.3, subsection 93, paragraph âaâ , subparagraph 32 (2) or (3). 33 c. Section 423.3, subsection 95, paragraph âaâ , subparagraph 34 (2) or (3). 35 -32- LSB 1390SV (2) 91 jm/jh 32/ 42 S.F. 614 Sec. 86. Section 427.1, subsection 37, paragraph b, Code 1 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 b. This data center business exemption applies beginning 3 with the assessment year the investment in or construction of 4 the facility utilizing the materials, equipment, and systems 5 set forth in paragraph âaâ are first assessed , or applies 6 beginning with the assessment year in which the date of the 7 initial lease term of a data center by a data center business 8 begins, as applicable . 9 Sec. 87. EFFECTIVE DATE. This division of this Act, being 10 deemed of immediate importance, takes effect upon enactment. 11 DIVISION XIII 12 ANIMAL CARE ORGANIZATION CHECKOFF 13 Sec. 88. NEW SECTION . 162.4B Animal care organizations ââ 14 fund ââ committee ââ grant program. 15 1. As used in this section: 16 a. âAnimal care organizationâ means an animal shelter 17 operating pursuant to a certificate of registration or a 18 renewed certification of operation issued by the department 19 under this chapter that has adopted a no-kill policy, except 20 when medically necessary. 21 b. âMedically necessaryâ means a service performed by an 22 animal care organization that is all of the following: 23 (1) Consistent with the symptoms and diagnosis made in 24 conformance with recommended veterinary practice standards. 25 (2) Reasonably calculated to prevent, diagnose, correct, 26 cure, alleviate, or prevent worsening of a condition that, left 27 untreated, may result in any of the following: 28 (a) The end of life. 29 (b) Pain, suffering, or loss of function. 30 (c) Infirmity. 31 2. An animal care organization fund is created in the state 32 treasury under the control of the department. The fund is 33 composed of moneys appropriated or available to and obtained 34 or accepted by the treasurer of state for deposit in the fund. 35 -33- LSB 1390SV (2) 91 jm/jh 33/ 42 S.F. 614 The fund shall include moneys transferred to the fund pursuant 1 to an income tax checkoff provided in chapter 422, subchapter 2 II, if applicable. All interest earned on moneys in the fund 3 shall be credited to and remain in the fund. Section 8.33 does 4 not apply to moneys in the fund. 5 3. Moneys in the fund that are authorized by the department 6 for expenditure are appropriated to the department and shall be 7 disbursed to animal care organizations pursuant to subsection 8 4. 9 4. a. An animal care organization committee is created 10 within the department. The committee shall be administered 11 by the department and shall determine the award of grant 12 moneys from the animal care organization fund to animal care 13 organizations. The committee shall distribute all available 14 moneys each year. Applicants for a grant shall apply to the 15 department on a form created by the department. 16 b. (1) The committee shall consist of three voting members: 17 (a) One member appointed by the secretary of agriculture who 18 is an animal warden. 19 (b) One member appointed by the secretary of agriculture 20 who is the executive director or the directorâs designee of an 21 animal rescue organization located in Iowa. 22 (c) One member shall be a veterinarian appointed by the 23 president of the Iowa veterinary medical association. 24 (2) The appointive terms of members appointed by the 25 secretary of agriculture shall be for a period of two years. 26 If there is a vacancy in the membership of the board for one 27 of the members appointed by the secretary of agriculture, the 28 secretary of agriculture has the power of appointment. 29 Sec. 89. NEW SECTION . 422.12M Income tax checkoff for 30 animal care organizations. 31 1. A person who files an individual or a joint income tax 32 return with the department of revenue under section 422.13 may 33 designate one dollar or more to be paid to the animal care fund 34 created in section 162.4B. If the refund due on the return or 35 -34- LSB 1390SV (2) 91 jm/jh 34/ 42 S.F. 614 the payment remitted with the return is insufficient to pay the 1 additional amount designated by the taxpayer to the animal care 2 organization fund, the amount designated shall be reduced to 3 the remaining amount remitted with the return. The designation 4 of a contribution to the animal care organization fund under 5 this section is irrevocable. 6 2. The director of revenue shall draft the income tax 7 form to allow the designation of contributions to the animal 8 care organization fund on the tax return. The department of 9 revenue, on or before January 31, shall transfer the total 10 amount designated on the tax return forms due in the preceding 11 calendar year to the animal care organization fund. However, 12 before a checkoff pursuant to this section shall be permitted, 13 all liabilities on the books of the department and accounts 14 identified as owing under section 421.65 shall be satisfied. 15 3. The department of agriculture and land stewardship may 16 authorize payment of moneys from the animal care organization 17 fund in accordance with section 162.4B. 18 4. This section is subject to repeal under section 422.12E. 19 Sec. 90. IMPLEMENTATION. The checkoff created in this 20 division of this Act shall be eligible for placement on the 21 individual income tax return form for the tax year beginning 22 January 1, 2025. 23